Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1406
Family resource and juvenile assessment center; integrate culturally relevant and trauma-informed services; establish community partnerships.

(1) Each family resource and juvenile assessment center shall integrate culturally relevant and trauma-informed services, including (a) tutoring, (b) mentoring from community leaders, including those with lived experience in the justice system, (c) conflict resolution and anger management training, (d) mental health and wellness services provided by culturally sensitive professionals, (e) social skills and job-readiness training, (f) financial literacy programs, (g) youth and family counseling, (h) cognitive behavioral therapy, (i) drug and substance abuse prevention and intervention, and (j) food and clothing assistance and resource navigation.

(2) Each center shall establish community partnerships to provide apprenticeships, vocational training, and mentorship opportunities with local businesses, trades, and community organizations.

Laws 2025, LB48, § 6.